New York, session 2025-2026, S8058.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 63-h of the retirement and social security law, as 2 added by chapter 533 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 63-h. Certain impairments of health; presumption. a. Any member of 4 the retirement system employed by the division of military and naval 5 affairs shall be eligible to retire pursuant to the provisions of this 6 section if [he or she] such member is an airport firefighter apprentice, 7 airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III 8 or training and safety officer. 9 b. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or of any general or 10 special law to the contrary, any condition of impairment of health 11 caused by: (1) diseases of the heart; or (2) any (i) melanoma or (ii) 12 condition of cancer affecting the lymphatic, digestive, hematological, 13 urinary, neurological, breast, reproductive, endocrine, thyroid, or 14 prostate systems resulting in disability to a member covered by this 15 section, presently employed, who successfully passed a physical examina- 16 tion on entry into service as an airport firefighter apprentice, airport 17 firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III or train- 18 ing and safety officer which examination failed to reveal evidence of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09941-05-6 S. 8058--B 2 1 any disease or other impairment of the heart or such melanoma or condi- 2 tion, shall be presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the perform- 3 ance and discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proven by competent 4 evidence and shall be paid a performance of duty disability retirement 5 allowance equal to that which is provided in section sixty-three of this 6 title, subject to the provisions of section sixty-four of this title. 7 c. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or of any general or 8 special law to the contrary, any condition of impairment of health 9 caused by diseases of the lung, resulting in disability to a member 10 covered by this section, presently employed, who successfully passed a 11 physical examination on entry into service as an airport firefighter 12 apprentice, airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport fire- 13 fighter III or training and safety officer, which examination failed to 14 disclose evidence of any disease or other impairment of the lung, shall 15 be presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the performance and 16 discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proven by competent evidence 17 and shall be paid a performance of duty disability retirement allowance 18 equal to that which is provided in section sixty-three of this title, 19 subject to the provisions of section sixty-four of this title. 20 d. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or of any general or 21 special law to the contrary, any condition of impairment of health 22 caused by Parkinson's Disease resulting in total or partial disability 23 or death to a member covered by this section, presently employed, who 24 successfully passed a physical examination on entry into service as an 25 airport firefighter apprentice, airport firefighter I, airport fire- 26 fighter II, airport firefighter III or training and safety officer, 27 which examination failed to reveal any evidence of such condition, shall 28 be presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the performance and 29 discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proven by competent evidence 30 and shall be paid a performance of duty disability retirement allowance 31 equal to that which is provided in section sixty-three of this title, 32 subject to the provisions of section sixty-four of this title. 33 e. After the filing of an application such member shall be given one 34 or more medical examinations. If the comptroller determines that the 35 member is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of 36 duty and ought to be retired for performance of duty disability, such 37 member shall be so retired. Such retirement shall be effective as of a 38 date approved by the comptroller. 39 [e.] f. If the member, at the time of the filing of such application, 40 is eligible for a service retirement benefit, then and in that event, 41 such member may simultaneously file an application for service retire- 42 ment, provided that the member indicates on the application for service 43 retirement that such application is filed without prejudice to the 44 application for performance of duty disability retirement. 45 § 2. Section 607-k of the retirement and social security law, as added 46 by chapter 533 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 47 § 607-k. Certain impairments of health; presumption. a. Any member of 48 the retirement system employed by the division of military and naval 49 affairs shall be eligible to retire pursuant to the provisions of this 50 section if [he or she] such member is an airport firefighter apprentice, 51 airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III 52 or training and safety officer. 53 b. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or of any general or 54 special law to the contrary, any condition of impairment of health 55 caused by: (1) diseases of the heart; or (2) any (i) melanoma or (ii) 56 condition of cancer affecting the lymphatic, digestive, hematological, S. 8058--B 3 1 urinary, neurological, breast, reproductive, endocrine, thyroid, or 2 prostate systems resulting in disability to a member covered by this 3 section, presently employed, who successfully passed a physical examina- 4 tion on entry into service as an airport firefighter apprentice, airport 5 firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III or train- 6 ing and safety officer which examination failed to reveal evidence of 7 any disease or other impairment of the heart or such melanoma or condi- 8 tion, shall be presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the perform- 9 ance and discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proven by competent 10 evidence and shall be paid a performance of duty disability retirement 11 allowance equal to that which is provided in section sixty-three of this 12 chapter, subject to the provisions of sections sixty-three and sixty- 13 four of this chapter. 14 c. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or of any general or 15 special law to the contrary, any condition of impairment of health 16 caused by diseases of the lung, resulting in disability to a member 17 covered by this section, presently employed, who successfully passed a 18 physical examination on entry into service as an airport firefighter 19 apprentice, airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport fire- 20 fighter III or training and safety officer, which examination failed to 21 disclose evidence of any disease or other impairment of the lung, shall 22 be presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the performance and 23 discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proven by competent evidence 24 and shall be paid a performance of duty disability retirement allowance 25 equal to that which is provided in section sixty-three of this chapter, 26 subject to the provisions of section sixty-four of this chapter. 27 d. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or of any general or 28 special law to the contrary, any condition of impairment of health 29 caused by Parkinson's Disease resulting in total or partial disability 30 or death to a member covered by this section, presently employed, who 31 successfully passed a physical examination on entry into service as an 32 airport firefighter apprentice, airport firefighter I, airport fire- 33 fighter II, airport firefighter III or training and safety officer, 34 which examination failed to reveal any evidence of such condition, shall 35 be presumptive evidence that it was incurred in the performance and 36 discharge of duty, unless the contrary be proven by competent evidence 37 and shall be paid a performance of duty disability retirement allowance 38 equal to that which is provided in section sixty-three of this chapter, 39 subject to the provisions of section sixty-four of this chapter. 40 e. After the filing of an application such member shall be given one 41 or more medical examinations. If the comptroller determines that the 42 member is physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of 43 duty and ought to be retired for performance of duty disability, such 44 member shall be so retired. Such retirement shall be effective as of a 45 date approved by the comptroller. 46 [e.] f. If the member, at the time of the filing of such application, 47 is eligible for a service retirement benefit, then and in that event, 48 such member may simultaneously file an application for service retire- 49 ment, provided that the member indicates on the application for service 50 retirement that such application is filed without prejudice to the 51 application for performance of duty disability retirement. 52 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would provide a performance of duty disability presumption to members of the New York State and Local Employees' Retirement System (NYSLERS) employed by the Division of Military and Naval Affairs in S. 8058--B 4 certain airport firefighter titles and who contract endocrine/thyroid cancer or Parkinson's disease. The retirement benefit will be equal to 75 percent of final average salary less workers' compensation. This bill will not materially increase the state of New York's annual contributions. In addition, there will be an immediate past service cost of $67,900 borne by the state of New York as a one-time payment. This cost assumes that payment will be made on March 1, 2027. Further, we anticipate some administrative costs to implement the provisions of this legislation. These estimated costs are based on 66 affected members employed by the Division of Military and Naval Affairs, with annual salary of approxi- mately 6.0 million as of March 31, 2025. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated March 23, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-96. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.